Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-212
Constitutional convention; special election; delegates; number.

When the question of calling a constitutional convention to revise, amend, or change the Constitution of Nebraska is submitted to the electors of the state, and a majority of the electors voting for or against the same vote for a convention, the Legislature shall at its next session provide by law for calling the same and for holding a special election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in the year following the year the electors voted to call a constitutional convention. At such special election, the electors of each legislative district of the state shall elect two delegates to such convention, hereinafter referred to as members of the constitutional convention, who shall have the qualifications of electors.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 1, p. 548.